Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB580.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 35 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a part to read:PART IPUBLIC HEALTHChapter31. Lead Levels in SoilCHAPTER 31LEAD LEVELS IN SOILSec.3101. Scope of chapter.3102. Definitions.1234567891011121314151617 3103. Prohibited lead levels.3104. Enforcement and penalties.3105. Administrative agency law.3106. Regulations.§ 3101. Scope of chapter.This chapter relates to lead levels in soil.§ 3102. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Abatement." As follows:(1) Any set of measures designed to eliminate or reduce the levels of lead specified in section 3103 (relating to prohibited lead levels).(2) The term includes:(i) The removal or covering of lead-contaminated soil.(ii) All preparation, cleanup, disposal and postabatement clearance testing activities associated with the abatement measures.(iii) Less-than-full abatement whereby the sources of lead contamination are reduced sufficiently to create a "lead-safe" environment rather than a "lead-free" environment.(3) The term does not include landscaping activities by contractors whose primary intent is not to permanently eliminate or reduce the levels of lead specified in section 3103."Child care center." As the term is defined in section 1001 of the act of June 13, 1967 (P.L.31, No.21), known as the Human 20250HB0580PN0582 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Services Code."Children." Individuals who are under 18 years of age."Department." The Department of Environmental Protection of the Commonwealth."Hazardous condition." A condition that causes exposure to prohibited levels of lead from lead-contaminated soil that would result in adverse human health effects."Person." Any of the following:(1) An individual.(2) A corporation, partnership, association or other similar entity.(3) The Commonwealth, including an agency or instrumentality of the Commonwealth.(4) A municipality, including an agency or instrumentality of a municipality.(5) A school entity.(6) A religious institution.(7) A child care center.(8) A charitable, educational or religious institution camp for children."Playground." As follows:(1) An outdoor improved area that is designed, equipped and set aside for children to play.(2) The term includes an area that is exclusively used as an athletic playing field or athletic court."School entity." A school district, joint school district, public school, private school, nonpublic school, charter school, regional charter school, intermediate unit or area career and technical school operating within this Commonwealth.§ 3103. Prohibited lead levels.20250HB0580PN0582 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 The permissible levels of lead regarding a playground shall be as follows:(1) In the bare soil on the playground, lead levels shall not exceed 200 parts per million.(2) In the bare soil of the yard in which the playground is located, lead levels shall not exceed 1,200 parts per million.§ 3104. Enforcement and penalties.(a) Prohibitions.--A person may not:(1) cause, suffer, permit or allow levels of lead in violation of this chapter or regulations promulgated under this chapter; or(2) c ause, suffer, permit or allow the performance of an act or operation in violation of an order issued by the department under this chapter or regulations promulgated under this chapter.(b) Violations.--The department may issue an order requiring compliance with this chapter or regulations promulgated under this chapter to a person engaging in a prohibited activity specified in subsection (a), including the owner or operator of the playground or yard in which the playground is located that contains prohibited levels of lead.(c) Service.--An order shall be served personally or by certified mail at the last known address of the person violating this chapter or a regulation promulgated under this chapter.(d) Hazardous conditions.--If the department determines that a hazardous condition exists due to the failure to comply with this chapter or a regulation promulgated under this chapter, the department, in addition to invoking other sanctions available to the department, may invoke any of the following remedies:20250HB0580PN0582 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) Issue an order to cease immediately all activities on the playground or yard in which the playground is located until the hazardous condition is corrected.(2) Evacuate appropriate portions of the playground or yard in which the playground is located until the hazardous condition is corrected.(3) Certify that the hazardous condition exists due to the failure of a person to comply with this chapter or a regulation promulgated under this chapter and charge the added cost of any corrective cleanup or removal to the person responsible for the hazardous condition and collect the cost by lien or any other means as may be authorized by law.(4) Apply to an appropriate court for relief by injunction or restraining order against a person responsible for the hazardous condition.(e) Penalties.--In addition to the sanctions or remedial orders provided in this section, a person that fails to comply with this chapter or a regulation promulgated under this chapter, or that fails to obey an order issued by the department, may be subject to any of the following penalties:(1) Imposition of an administrative penalty of not more than $1,000 for the first offense, not more than $5,000 for the second offense and not more than $10,000 for the third and each subsequent offense.(2) Issuance of an order to cease immediately all activities on the playground or yard in which the playground is located.(3) Initiation of a legal action or proceeding in a court of competent jurisdiction.(f) Continued violations.--Each day a violation continues to 20250HB0580PN0582 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 exist shall constitute an additional, separate and distinct violation for which a separate penalty shall be imposed.§ 3105. Administrative agency law.Penalties and other orders of the department under this chapter are subject to 2 Pa.C.S. Chs. 5 Subch. A (relating to practice and procedure of Commonwealth agencies) and 7 Subch. A (relating to judicial review of Commonwealth agency action).§ 3106. Regulations.The department shall promulgate regulations necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0580PN0582 - 6 - 1234567891011